Tennessee, session 114, HB1920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106(f)(1), is amended by deleting
the language "one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250)" and substituting "two thousand
two hundred fifty-one dollars ($2,251)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect November 3, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1920
011871
- 1 -